Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4175.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Department of Transportation shall conduct a study of speed bumps
to examine the possibility of developing uniform standards for speed bump height and speed
bump markings and shall make a report on its findings.
(2) The department shall submit the report required by subsection (1) of this section, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to transportation in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than
September 15, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 311